Utah statutes.
4-24-6.   State may be divided into brand inspection districts --
Description filed with county clerk and sheriff.
The commissioner, to facilitate and improve brand inspection, may divide the
state into brand inspection districts.  A description covering each district
shall be filed by the department with each county clerk and county sheriff in
the state.  District boundaries may be changed as considered necessary by the
commissioner, with the approval of the Livestock Brand Board.  Brand
inspection stations within brand inspection districts may be located and
established by the commissioner to assist in the enforcement of this chapter.
